Idaho, session 2026, H0533.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 49-202, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
49-202. DUTIES OF DEPARTMENT. (1) All registration and driver's li-
cense records in the office of the department shall be public records and
open to inspection by the public during normal business hours, except for
those records declared by law to be for the confidential use of the depart-
ment, or those records containing personal information subject to restric-
tions or conditions regarding disclosure. If the department has contracted
for a service to be provided by another entity, an additional fee shall be
charged by that contractor whether the service is rendered during normal
business hours, other than normal business hours or on weekends.
(2) In addition to other fees required by law to be collected by the de-
partment, the department shall collect the following:
(a) For certifying a copy of any record pertaining to any vehicle li-
cense, any certificate of title, or any driver's license ....... $14.00
(b) For issuing every Idaho certificate of title .............. $14.00
(c) For furnishing a duplicate copy of any Idaho certificate
of title ................................................... $14.00
(d) For issuance or transfer of every certificate of title on a new or
used vehicle or other titled vehicle in an expedited manner (rush ti-
tles), in addition to any other fee required by this section .... $26.00
(e) For recording a transitional ownership document, in addition to any
other fee required by this section ........................... $26.00
(f) For furnishing a replacement of any receipt
of registration ............................................. $5.00


(g) For furnishing copies of registration or ownership of motor vehi-
cles or driver's license records, per vehicle registration, accident
report records, title or per driver's license record ........... $7.00
Additional contractor fee, not to exceed ...................... $4.00
(h) For services in searching files of vehicle or other
registrations, vehicle titles, or driver's licenses per hour .. $18.00
(i) Placing "stop" cards in vehicle registration or title
files, each ................................................ $21.00
(j) For issuance of an assigned or replacement vehicle
identification number (VIN) ................................. $18.00
(k) For a vehicle identification number (VIN) inspection whether con-
ducted by a city or county peace officer or any other peace officer or
designated agent of the state of Idaho, per inspection .......... $5.00
(l) For all replacement registration stickers, each ........... $2.00
(m) For issuing letters of temporary vehicle clearance
to Idaho-based motor carriers ............................... $18.00
(n) For all sample license plates, each .......................$21.00
(o) For filing release of liability statements ................ $3.50
(p) For safety and insurance programs for each vehicle operated
by a motor carrier ........................................... $3.00
A lesser amount may be set by rule of the board.
(3) The fees required in this section shall not apply when the service
is furnished to any federal, state, county or city peace officer when such
service is required in the performance of their duties as peace officers.
(4) The department may enter into agreements with private companies or
public entities to provide the services for which a fee is collected in sub-
section (2)(g) of this section. Such private contractor shall collect the
fee prescribed and remit the fee to the department. The contractor shall
also collect and retain the additional fee charged for his services.
(5)(a) The department shall pay three dollars ($3.00) of the fee col-
lected by a county assessor or other authorized agent of the department
as provided in subsection (2)(a) through (f) of this section, and four
dollars ($4.00) as provided in subsection (2)(g) of this section, to
the county assessor or sheriff of the county or authorized agent of
the department collecting such fee, which shall be deposited with the
county treasurer and credited to the county current expense fund when
collected by the county. When fees are collected by the department or an
authorized agent of the department, such fees shall be deposited with
the issuing entity. The remainder of the fees collected as provided in
that subsection shall be paid by the department to the state treasurer
and placed in the state highway account.
(b) The fee collected under subsection (2)(k) of this section for a VIN
inspection shall be placed in the city general fund if conducted by a
city peace officer, in the county current expense fund if conducted by a
county peace officer, shall be retained by the special agent authorized
to perform the inspection, or paid to the state treasurer and placed to
the credit of the Idaho state police if conducted by the Idaho state po-
lice or in the state highway account if conducted by the department.
(c) The fee collected under subsection (2)(o) of this section for fil-
ing release of liability statements shall be retained by the county as-


sessor of the county collecting such fee and shall be deposited with the
county treasurer and credited to the county current expense fund. Any
fees collected by the department for filing release of liability state-
ments shall be retained by the department. However, the fees provided
for in subsection (2)(o) of this section shall not apply when a transac-
tion is filed electronically with the department.
(d) The fee in subsection (2)(m) of this section shall not apply when
the Idaho-based motor carrier or its representative obtains and prints
the document using internet access.
(e) The fee collected under subsection (2)(p) of this section for mo-
tor carriers shall be paid by the department to the state treasurer and
placed in the state highway account. The director and the director of
the Idaho state police shall jointly determine the amount to be trans-
ferred from the state highway account to the law enforcement fund for
motor carrier safety programs conducted by the Idaho state police pur-
suant to the provisions of section 67-2901A, Idaho Code.
(6) The department as often as practicable may provide to law enforce-
ment agencies the record of suspensions and revocations of driver licenses
via the public safety and security information system (ILETS).
(7) The department shall provide the forms prescribed in chapter 5 of
this title, shall receive and file in its office in Ada county all instru-
ments required in chapter 5 of this title to be filed with the department,
shall prescribe a uniform method of numbering certificates of title, and
shall maintain in the department indices for such certificates of title. All
indices shall be by motor or identification number and alphabetical by name
of the owner.
(8) The department shall file each registration received under a
distinctive registration number assigned to the vehicle and to the owner
thereof.
(9) The department shall not renew a driver's license or identification
card when fees required by law have not been paid or where fees for past pe-
riods are due, owing and unpaid including insufficient fund checks, until
those fees have been paid.
(10) The department shall not grant the registration of a vehicle when:
(a) The applicant is not entitled to registration under the provisions
of this title; or
(b) The applicant has neglected or refused to furnish the department
with the information required in the appropriate form or reasonable ad-
ditional information required by the department; or
(c) The fees required by law have not been paid, or where fees for past
registration periods are due, owing and unpaid including insufficient
fund checks.
(11) The department or its authorized agents have the authority to re-
quest any person to submit to medical, vision, highway, or written examina-
tions, to protect the safety of the public upon the highways. The depart-
ment or its authorized agents may exercise such authority based upon evi-
dence which may include, but is not limited to, observations made.
(12) The department shall revoke the registration of any vehicle:
(a) Which the department shall determine is unsafe or unfit to be oper-
ated or is not equipped as required by law;


(b) Whenever the person to whom the registration card or registration
plate has been issued shall make or permit to be made any unlawful use of
the same or permit their use by a person not entitled thereto;
(c) For any violation of vehicle registration requirements by the owner
or operator in the current or past registration periods;
(d) Whenever a motor carrier requests revocation, or whenever an inter-
state carrier's federal operating authority has been revoked;
(e) For failure of the owner or operator to file the reports required
or nonpayment of audit assessments or fees assessed against the owner by
the department or the state tax commission pursuant to audit under the
provisions of section 49-439, Idaho Code;
(f) Identified by any city or county administering a program estab-
lished by ordinance for the inspection and readjustment of motor vehi-
cles (which program is part of an approved state implementation plan
adopted by both the state and federal governments under 42 U.S.C. 7410)
as having failed to comply with an ordinance requiring motor vehicle
emission inspection and readjustment; provided that no vehicle shall be
identified to the department under this subsection unless:
(i) The city or county certifies to the department that the owner
of the motor vehicle has been given notice and had the opportunity
for a hearing concerning compliance with the ordinance and has ex-
hausted all remedies and appeals from any determination made at
such hearing; and
(ii) The city or county reimburses the department for all direct
costs associated with the registration revocation procedure.
(13) The department shall not reregister or permit a vehicle to oper-
ate on a special trip permit until all fees, penalties and interest have been
paid.
(14) The department shall institute educational programs, demonstra-
tions, exhibits and displays.
(15) The department shall cancel a driver's license or identification
card when fees required by law have not been paid or where fees are due, owing
and unpaid including insufficient fund checks, until those fees have been
paid.
(16) The department shall examine persons and vehicles by written,
oral, vision and skills tests without compulsion except as provided by law.
(17) The department shall employ expert and special help as needed in
the department.
(18) The department shall compile accident statistics and disseminate
information relating to those statistics.
(19) The department shall cooperate with the United States in the elimi-
nation of road hazards, whether of a physical, visual or mental character.
(20) The department shall place and maintain traffic-control devices,
conforming to the board's manual and specifications, upon all state highways
as it shall deem necessary to indicate and to carry out the provisions of this
title or to regulate, warn, or guide traffic. No local authority shall place
or maintain any traffic-control device upon any highway under the jurisdic-
tion of the department except by the latter's permission. The placement and
maintenance of such a traffic-control device by a local authority shall be


made according to the board's manual and specifications for a uniform system
of traffic-control devices.
(21) The department may conduct an investigation of any bridge or other
elevated structure constituting a part of a highway, and, if it shall find
that the structure cannot with safety to itself withstand vehicles travel-
ing at a speed otherwise permissible under this title, shall determine and
declare the maximum speed of vehicles which the structure can safely with-
stand, and shall cause or permit suitable signs stating the maximum speed to
be erected and maintained before each end of the structure.
(22) Whenever the department shall determine on the basis of an engi-
neering and traffic investigation that slow speeds on any highway or part of
a highway impede the normal and reasonable movement of traffic, the depart-
ment may determine and declare a minimum speed limit below which no person
shall drive a vehicle except when necessary for safe operation or in compli-
ance with law, and that limit shall be effective when posted upon appropriate
fixed or variable signs.
(23) The department shall regulate or prohibit the use of any con-
trolled-access highway by any class or kind of traffic which is found to be
incompatible with the normal and safe movement of traffic.
(24) The department shall erect and maintain traffic-control devices on
controlled-access highways on which any prohibitions are applicable.
(25) The department and local authorities are authorized to determine
those portions of any highway under their respective jurisdictions where
overtaking and passing or driving on the left side of the roadway would be
especially hazardous and may by appropriate signs or markings on the roadway
indicate the beginning and end of those zones and when signs or markings are
in place and clearly visible to an ordinarily observant person, every driver
of a vehicle shall obey those directions.
(26) The department and local authorities in their respective juris-
dictions may in their discretion issue special permits authorizing the
operation upon a highway of traction engines or tractors having movable
tracks with transverse corrugations upon the periphery of the movable tracks
or farm tractors or other farm machinery, the operation of which upon a high-
way would otherwise be prohibited under this title or title 40, Idaho Code.
(27) The department and local highway authorities within their respec-
tive jurisdictions may place official traffic-control devices prohibiting,
limiting or restricting the stopping, standing or parking of vehicles on any
highway where such stopping, standing or parking is dangerous to those using
the highway or where the stopping, standing or parking of vehicles unduly in-
terferes with the free movement of traffic thereon.
(28) On any informational material printed after July 1, 1995, by or at
the order of the department and distributed to counties, school districts
or individuals for the purpose of assisting a person to successfully pass
a driver's license test, the department shall include material about the
state's open range law and responsibilities, liabilities and obligations of
drivers driving in the open range.
(29) All employees, agents, and contractors of the department who have
access to the source systems used by the division of motor vehicles shall be
required to complete data security compliance training and to pass a federal
bureau of investigation criminal background check. The department shall ad-


minister access to and provide for the training required pursuant to this
subsection.
SECTION 2. That Section 49-402, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
49-402. ANNUAL REGISTRATION. (1) The annual fee for operating each
pickup truck, each neighborhood electric vehicle and each other motor ve-
hicle having a maximum gross weight not in excess of eight thousand (8,000)
pounds and that complies with the federal motor vehicle safety standards as
defined in section 49-107, Idaho Code, shall be:
Vehicles one (1) and two (2) years old .........................$69.00
Vehicles three (3) and four (4) years old ......................$57.00
Vehicles five (5) and six (6) years old ........................$57.00
Vehicles seven (7) and eight (8) years old .....................$45.00
Vehicles over eight (8) years old .............................$45.00
There shall be twelve (12) registration periods, starting in January
for holders of validation registration stickers numbered 1, and proceed-
ing consecutively through December for holders of validation registration
stickers numbered 12, each of which. Each registration period shall start on
the first day of a calendar month and end on the last day of the twelfth month
from the first day of the beginning month. Registration periods shall expire
at midnight on the last day of the registration period in the year designated
by the validation registration sticker. The numeral digit on the validation
registration stickers shall, as does the registration card, fix the reg-
istration the registration card. The registration period is fixed by the
registration card under the staggered registration system for the purpose of
reregistration and notice of expiration.
A vehicle that has once been registered for any of the above-designated
periods shall, upon reregistration, be registered for the period bearing the
same number month, and the registration card shall show and be the exclusive
proof of the expiration date of registration and licensing. Vehicles may be
initially registered for less than a twelve (12) month period, or for more
than a twelve (12) month period, and the fee prorated on a monthly basis if
the fractional registration tends to fulfill the purpose of the monthly se-
ries registration system.
(2) For all school buses operated either by a nonprofit, nonpublic
school or operated pursuant to a service contract with a school district for
transporting children to or from school or in connection with school-ap-
proved activities, the annual fee shall be twenty-four dollars ($24.00) and
shall be subject to staggered registration for the purpose of reregistration
and notice of expiration.
(3) For all motorcycles and motor-driven cycles that comply with the
federal motor vehicle safety standards, operated on the public highways, the
annual fee shall be nineteen dollars ($19.00) and shall be subject to stag-
gered registration for the purpose of reregistration and notice of expira-
tion.
(4) For operation of an all-terrain vehicle, utility type vehicle or
motorbike, excluding a motorbike with an engine displacement of fifty (50)
cubic centimeters or less, on city, county or highway district roads or
highways open to such use, a restricted vehicle license plate fee pursuant


to section 49-450, Idaho Code, shall be paid. In addition, the certifi-
cate of number fee specified in section 67-7122, Idaho Code, shall be paid
as provided in section 67-7122, Idaho Code. The certificate of number and
restricted vehicle license plate exemption provided in section 49-426(2),
Idaho Code, applies to all-terrain vehicles, utility type vehicles, motor-
bikes and motorcycles used for the purposes described in section 49-426(2),
Idaho Code. Nonresidents shall be allowed to purchase a restricted vehicle
license plate and validation sticker pursuant to section 67-7124, Idaho
Code, for an all-terrain vehicle, utility type vehicle, or motorbike.
(5) For all motor homes, the fee shall be as specified in subsection (1)
of this section and shall be in addition to the fees provided for in section
49-445, Idaho Code.
(6) Registration fees shall not be subject to refund.
(7) A financial institution or repossession service contracted to
a financial institution repossessing vehicles under the terms of a secu-
rity agreement shall move the vehicle from the place of repossession to the
financial institution's place of business on a repossession plate. The
repossession plate shall also be used for demonstrating the vehicle to a
prospective purchaser for a period not to exceed ninety-six (96) hours. The
registration fees for repossession plates shall be as required in subsection
(1) of this section for a vehicle one (1) and two (2) years old. All other
fees required under chapter 4, title 49, Idaho Code, shall be in addition to
the registration fee. The repossession plate shall be subject to staggered
registration for the purpose of reregistration and notice of expiration.
(8) A wrecker or towing business engaged in the process of towing motor-
ized vehicles that have been wrecked, abandoned, salvaged or may be disabled
may apply for a wrecker plate to be displayed on those vehicles being towed,
provided the power unit is properly registered under this chapter. The reg-
istration fees for wrecker plates shall be as required in subsection (1) of
this section for a vehicle one (1) and two (2) years old. All other fees re-
quired under chapter 4, title 49, Idaho Code, shall be in addition to the reg-
istration fee and shall be subject to staggered registration for the purpose
of reregistration and notice of expiration.
(9) In addition to the annual registration fee in this section, there
shall be an initial program fee of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) and an an-
nual program fee of fifteen dollars ($15.00) for all special license plate
programs for those license plates issued pursuant to sections 49-404A,
49-407, 49-408, 49-409, 49-414, 49-416, 49-418 and 49-418D, Idaho Code. For
special plates issued pursuant to section 49-417E, Idaho Code, there shall
be an initial program fee of seventy dollars ($70.00) and an annual program
fee of fifty dollars ($50.00). For special plates issued pursuant to sec-
tions 49-406 and 49-406A, Idaho Code, there shall be an initial program fee
of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) but there shall be no annual renewal fee.
For special plates issued pursuant to sections 49-415D, 49-417, 49-417A,
49-417B, 49-417C, 49-417D, 49-418A, 49-418B, 49-418C, 49-419, 49-419A,
49-419C, 49-419E, 49-420, 49-420A, 49-420B, 49-420C, 49-420D, 49-420E,
49-420J, 49-420K, 49-420L, 49-420M, 49-420N, 49-420O, 49-420P, 49-420Q,
49-420R, 49-420S, and 49-420T, and 49-420T 49-420U, Idaho Code, and unless
otherwise expressly provided for in this chapter, any new special plate
program effective on and after January 1, 2013, pursuant to section 49-402D,


Idaho Code, there shall be an initial program fee of thirty-five dollars
($35.00) and an annual program fee of twenty-five dollars ($25.00). The fees
contained in this subsection shall be applicable to all new special plate
programs and shall be subject to staggered registration for the purpose of
reregistration and notice of expiration. The initial program fee and the
annual program fee shall be deposited in the state highway account and shall
be used to fund the cost of administration of special license plate programs,
unless otherwise specified by law.
(10) Any vehicle that does not meet federal motor vehicle safety stan-
dards shall not be registered and shall not be permitted to operate on public
highways of the state, as defined in section 40-117, Idaho Code, unless oth-
erwise specifically authorized.
(11) In addition to annual registration fees as provided in this sec-
tion, registrants may pay a fee to purchase an Idaho state parks passport
authorizing resident motor vehicle entry into all Idaho state parks. Reg-
istrants may pay the fee for a one (1) year or two (2) year period of time.
The fee shall be ten dollars ($10.00) for one (1) year and twenty dollars
($20.00) for two (2) years. All fees collected pursuant to this subsection
shall be deposited into the park and recreation fund and shall be subject to
appropriation. Fees collected pursuant to this subsection shall not be con-
sidered a motor vehicle registration fee as provided in section 17, article
VII of the constitution of the state of Idaho.
SECTION 3. That Section 49-402A, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
49-402A. UTILITY TRAILERS -- REGISTRATION, FEES AND TRANSFERS. (1)
The department shall register a utility trailer for a period of one (1) year
for a fee of five dollars ($5.00).
(2) The department may register a utility trailer for a five (5) year
period or for a ten (10) year period, and shall issue a license plate with
the year of expiration designated by a validation sticker the registration
card. Five (5) year registrations shall cost twenty dollars ($20.00) and ten
(10) year registrations shall cost thirty dollars ($30.00) and shall be sub-
ject to staggered registration for the purpose of reregistration and notice
of expiration.
(3) If ownership or interest in the trailer transfers as a result of a
sale, neither the registration card nor plate can be transferred to another
person. The registration card and plate shall remain in the possession of
the transferor and may be transferred to another utility trailer owned by the
transferor, and shall be valid until expiration of the original registra-
tion.
SECTION 4. That Section 49-402E, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
49-402E. RENTAL FLEET REGISTRATION. (1) As used in this section
"rental fleet" means more than twenty-five (25) motor vehicles that are:
(a) Owned by a rental company;
(b) Offered for rental without a hired driver through a rental agree-
ment; and


(c) Designated by the registered owner of the motor vehicle as a rental
fleet vehicle at the time of registration.
(2)(a) On and after the effective date of this act, an owner that reg-
isters a motor vehicle, weighing sixteen thousand (16,000) pounds or
less, under the provisions of chapter 4, title 49, Idaho Code, may ob-
tain an alternative special registration card and rental car stickers
for the license plates if the motor vehicle is owned by a rental company
and maintained in the rental company's rental fleet.
(b) Although annual registration shall be required for each fleet ve-
hicle, the registration card and rental car stickers for the license
plates issued under paragraph (a) of this subsection are valid for the
life of the motor vehicle while the motor vehicle is maintained in the
rental fleet.
(3) An owner that receives the alternative special registration card
and rental car stickers for the license plates issued under this section
shall renew the annual registration. If registration is not renewed, the
registration shall be canceled.
(4) In addition to the registration fees collected under chapter 4, ti-
tle 49, Idaho Code, the department shall also collect an additional two dol-
lars ($2.00) for the initial registration for each vehicle registered under
this section, which shall be deposited in the state highway account.
SECTION 5. That Section 49-411, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
49-411. DEALER AND MANUFACTURER PLATE -- FEES. (1) Any person conduct-
ing the business of manufacturing, buying, selling or dealing in vehicles,
and licensed as a manufacturer of or a dealer in vehicles, and owning and op-
erating any such vehicle upon any highway may, in lieu of registering each
vehicle, obtain from the department upon application on the proper form and
payment of the required fee, and attach to each vehicle, one (1) number plate
as required for different classes of vehicles in section 49-434, Idaho Code.
The special number plate shall bear a distinctive number assigned to the man-
ufacturer or dealer, the name of this state, which may be abbreviated, and
the year for which the plate is issued, together with words which may be ab-
breviated or a distinguishing symbol indicating that the plate is issued to a
manufacturer or dealer.
(a) Dealer license plates shall be limited to two (2) license plates
for up to twenty (20) vehicles sold during the previous dealer licensing
period and one (1) license plate for each ten (10) additional vehicles
sold during the previous dealer licensing period. Any new dealer who
applies for a dealer license shall be eligible for the number of dealer
plates requested based on the number of vehicles that the dealer esti-
mates he will sell during the first year of licensure.
(b) Upon renewal of a dealer's license, the department may audit vehi-
cle sales from previous years to determine the number of dealer plates
that will be authorized for the current dealer licensing period.
(2) The fee to validate a dealer or manufacturer number plate shall be
twelve dollars ($12.00) for each validation sticker.
(3) All such fees shall be paid to the state treasurer and deposited to
the state highway account.


(4) Laden dealer or manufacturer plates shall be available to licensed
dealers and manufacturers operating vehicles with laden loads in further-
ance of their business pursuant to section 49-1627(5), Idaho Code. Such
plates shall be exempt from the limit provisions of subsection (1)(a) of this
section. The operating fee for a laden dealer or manufacturer plate will
be equal to the fees for commercial vehicles pursuant to section 49-434(1),
Idaho Code, for twenty-six thousand (26,000) pounds. Laden dealer and man-
ufacturer plates are limited to a maximum combined gross vehicle weight of
twenty-six thousand (26,000) pounds. Temporary weight increase permits may
be purchased pursuant to section 49-432(2), Idaho Code.
SECTION 6. That Section 49-412, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
49-412. VEHICLE DEALER LOANER PLATE. (1) A dealer, owning a vehicle
may obtain, upon application to the department upon a proper form and payment
of the fee required, and display on a vehicle loaned to a customer, a loaner
vehicle number plate. The plate shall be the same design and numbering sys-
tem as the plate issued for passenger vehicles or motorcycles.
(2) The fee for each loaner plate or registration sticker card shall be
as provided in section 49-402(1), Idaho Code, for new vehicles.
(3) All such fees shall be paid to the state treasurer and deposited to
the state highway account.
SECTION 7. That Section 49-428, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
49-428. DISPLAY OF PLATE AND STICKERS. (1) License plates assigned to
a motor vehicle shall be attached, one (1) in the front, if the vehicle is
equipped with a front license plate mounting bracket, and the other in the
rear, with the exception of the following:
(a) The license plate assigned to a motorcycle, all-terrain vehicle,
utility type vehicle, motorbike or semitrailer and the license plate
assigned to a motor vehicle operated by a manufacturer, repossession
agent or dealer shall be attached to the rear.
(b) Vehicles displaying year of manufacture, old timer, classic car,
street rod, or custom vehicle license plates shall be allowed to display
one (1) plate attached to the rear of the vehicle.
(c) The license plate attached to a tractor shall be attached to the
front.
(d) The wrecker plate shall be displayed on the vehicle being towed in
such a manner as to be visible when the vehicle being towed is approached
from the rear.
License plates shall be displayed during the current registration year. The
annual registration sticker for the current registration year shall be dis-
played on each license plate, except for trailers, semitrailers, and com-
mercial vehicles over twenty-six thousand (26,000) pounds under the provi-
sions of sections 49-434 and 49-435, Idaho Code. For the purposes of this
title, the license plates together with the registration stickers card shall
be considered as license plates for the year designated on the registration
sticker card. For purposes of this chapter, a validation sticker issued to


the operator of an all-terrain vehicle, utility type vehicle, or motorbike
under the provisions of sections 67-7122 and 67-7124, Idaho Code, shall be
considered the registration sticker.
(2) Every license plate shall at all times be securely fastened to the
vehicle to which it is assigned to prevent the plate from swinging, be at a
height not less than twelve (12) inches from the ground, measuring from the
bottom of the plate, be in a place and position to be clearly visible, and be
maintained free from foreign materials and in a condition to be clearly legi-
ble, and all registration stickers shall be securely attached to the license
plates and shall be displayed as provided in section 49-443(4), Idaho Code.
SECTION 8. That Section 49-434, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
49-434. OPERATING FEES. (1) There shall be paid on all commercial ve-
hicles, noncommercial vehicles, and on all farm vehicles having a maximum
gross weight not in excess of sixty thousand (60,000) pounds, an annual reg-
istration fee or a staggered registration fee for the purpose of reregistra-
tion and notice of expiration in accordance with the following schedule.
Unladen Weight for Wreckers Annual Registration Fee
Maximum Gross Weight Noncommercial and Commercial
For Other Vehicles (Pounds) Farm Vehicles Vehicles
and Wreckers
8,001-16,000 inc. ........... $ 48.00 $ 48.00
16,001-26,000 inc. ........... 61.08 143.40
26,001-30,000 inc. ........... 91.68 223.80
30,001-40,000 inc. ........... 130.08 291.60
40,001-50,000 inc. ........... 188.28 360.00
50,001-60,000 inc. ........... 311.88 515.40
In addition to the registration fees provided for in this subsection, there
shall be an additional registration fee imposed of twenty-five dollars
($25.00).
(2) There shall be paid on all commercial vehicles, irrespective of
body type, and on all farm vehicles having a maximum gross weight in excess
of sixty thousand (60,000) pounds, an annual registration fee in the amount
prescribed by subsection (8) of this section, as applicable.
(3) In addition, the annual registration fee for trailers shall be:
(a) Trailer or semitrailer in a combination of vehicles ........$15.00
(b) Rental utility trailer with a gross weight of two thousand (2,000)
pounds or less ................................................$8.00
(c) Rental utility trailer with a gross weight over two thousand
(2,000) pounds ..............................................$15.00
(4) As an option to the trailer and semitrailer and rental utility
trailer annual registrations issued pursuant to subsection (3) of this
section, the department may provide a nonexpiring plate and registration
for trailers and semitrailers, and an optional, extended registration for
rental utility trailers.


(a) For trailers and semitrailers, the nonexpiring registration fee
shall be ninety-nine dollars ($99.00). The license plate shall remain
on the trailer or semitrailer until the registration is canceled or re-
voked. No part of the fee is subject to refund. However, the registrant
may transfer the nonexpiring plate and registration to another trailer
or semitrailer titled to the registrant if the original registration
date is prior to July 1, 2009. The registration document shall be the
official record of the status of the nonexpiring registration, and no
registration fee shall be required after the initial registration is
paid. No validation sticker shall be issued for license plates assigned
under this section. The owner may be issued an electronic copy of the
registration card issued pursuant to this section.
(i) Registration of a trailer or semitrailer based in another ju-
risdiction may be issued when the registrant provides a valid ju-
risdiction title or ownership document and certification state-
ment, and no title transfer will be required.
(ii) Periodic verification will be made to confirm ownership sta-
tus. Failure of the owner to comply with the verification request
to confirm ownership within thirty (30) days shall result in can-
cellation of the permanent plate registration.
(b) Idaho-based trailer manufacturers may purchase trailer and semi-
trailer registration from the department. The manufacturer may issue
the annual registration to foreign-based purchasers utilizing a manu-
facturer's certificate of origin or manufacturer's statement of origin
as proof of ownership. If the foreign-based purchaser subsequently ob-
tains an Idaho nonexpiring registration as provided in paragraph (a) of
this subsection prior to annual registration expiration, the amount of
the annual registration fee shall be applied to the nonexpiring regis-
tration fee provided that the customer acquires a title for such vehi-
cle.
(c) For rental utility trailers, the registrant may prepay the annual
registration for an additional one (1), two (2), three (3) or four (4)
years, but in no event shall the optional registration period extend
beyond five (5) years. The fee shall be as specified in subsection
(3)(b) or (c) of this section. The owner shall be issued a registration
card or may request such card to be sent electronically. The expiration
date shall be reflected on such registration card. The license plate
shall become void if the owner's interest in the rental utility trailer
changes during the five (5) year period. If the owner fails to enter
the rental utility trailer on the annual renewal application during
the five (5) year period, the registration record shall be purged. Any
unrenewed plate shall be returned to the department if it is not entered
on the renewal application.
(5) A fleet registration option is available to owners who have
twenty-five (25) or more commercial or farm vehicles or any combination
thereof. Such owners may register all of their company vehicles with the
department in lieu of registering with a county assessor. To qualify, the
fleet must be owned and operated under the unified control of one (1) person
and the vehicles must be physically garaged and maintained in two (2) or more
counties. Fleet registration shall not include fleets of rental vehicles.


The department shall provide a registration application to the owner, and
the owner shall provide all information that the department determines is
necessary. The department shall devise a special license plate numbering
system for fleet-registered vehicles as an alternative to county license
plates. The fleet registration application and all subsequent registration
renewals shall include the physical address where a vehicle is principally
used, garaged and maintained. The fleet owner shall report the physical
address to the department upon initial registration, on each renewal, and at
any time a vehicle registered under this option is permanently transferred
to another location.
(6) If the ownership of a vehicle changes during the registration pe-
riod, the original owner may transfer the plate to another vehicle. The re-
maining fee shall be credited against the cost of the new registration. Re-
funds may be given for any unexpired portion of the vehicle registration fee
if the plate is not transferred by the owner to another vehicle. Any re-
quest for refund shall include surrender of the license plate and registra-
tion document, if a physical document was issued. Owners of vehicles regis-
tered under the international registration plan may request a refund of the
unexpired portion of the Idaho vehicle registration fee by presenting ev-
idence from the base jurisdiction that the license plate and registration
document, if a physical document was issued, have been surrendered. A li-
cense plate shall not be transferred to another owner when the ownership of
a vehicle changes. The owner shall obtain a replacement plate, if required,
and a printed or electronic registration document when a plate is lost, de-
stroyed, or becomes illegible.
(7) An administrative fee of four dollars ($4.00) shall be paid and de-
posited to the state highway account on all registrations completed by the
department under subsection (1) or (8)(a) of this section. Vehicles regis-
tered under subsection (8)(b) of this section shall pay the fee provided in
section 49-435(2), Idaho Code.
(8) There shall be paid on all commercial and farm vehicles having a
maximum gross weight in excess of sixty thousand (60,000) pounds, a regis-
tration fee based upon the maximum gross weight of a vehicle as declared by
the owner and the total number of miles driven on roads and highways in the
state, county, city and highway district systems in Idaho, and if registered
under the international registration plan (IRP), in all other jurisdic-
tions. The appropriate registration fee shall be determined as follows:
(a) If the owner registers vehicles under the international registra-
tion plan (IRP), the appropriate mileage column shall be determined by
the total miles an owner operated a fleet of vehicles on roads and high-
ways in the state, county, city and highway district systems in Idaho
and in all other jurisdictions in the preceding year, as defined in sec-
tion 49-117, Idaho Code, and by the maximum gross weight of each vehicle
within a fleet.
(b) If the owner registers vehicles under the international registra-
tion plan and determines that the average international registration
plan fleet miles, calculated by dividing the total IRP fleet miles in
all jurisdictions by the number of registered vehicles, is less than
fifty thousand one (50,001) miles, the owner may apply to the depart-
ment for refund of a portion of the registration fees paid, consistent


with the fee schedules set forth in this section. The department shall
provide an application for the refund. An owner making application for
refund under this section shall be subject to auditing as provided in
section 49-439, Idaho Code.
(c) If the owner is not registering vehicles under the international
registration plan, the appropriate mileage column shall be determined
by the total miles the owner operated each of the vehicles to be regis-
tered on roads and highways in the state, county, city and highway dis-
trict systems in Idaho in the preceding year and by the maximum gross
weight of each vehicle.
Maximum Gross
Weight of Vehicle
(Pounds) Total Miles Driven
1 to 7,501 to 20,001 to 35,001 to Over
7,500 20,000 35,000 50,000 50,000
60,001-62,000 $223 $ 511 $ 789 $1,068 $1,560
62,001-64,000 $251 $ 576 $ 890 $1,205 $1,760
64,001-66,000 $280 $ 642 $ 992 $1,342 $1,960
66,001-68,000 $309 $ 707 $1,093 $1,479 $2,160
68,001-70,000 $337 $ 773 $1,194 $1,615 $2,360
70,001-72,000 $366 $ 838 $1,295 $1,752 $2,560
72,001-74,000 $394 $ 904 $1,396 $1,889 $2,760
74,001-76,000 $423 $ 969 $1,498 $2,026 $2,960
76,001-78,000 $451 $1,035 $1,599 $2,163 $3,160
78,001-80,000 $480 $1,100 $1,700 $2,300 $3,360
80,001-82,000 $494 $1,133 $1,751 $2,368 $3,460
82,001-84,000 $509 $1,165 $1,801 $2,437 $3,560
84,001-86,000 $523 $1,198 $1,852 $2,505 $3,660
86,001-88,000 $537 $1,231 $1,902 $2,574 $3,760
88,001-90,000 $551 $1,264 $1,953 $2,642 $3,860
90,001-92,000 $566 $1,296 $2,004 $2,711 $3,960
92,001-94,000 $580 $1,329 $2,054 $2,779 $4,060
94,001-96,000 $594 $1,362 $2,105 $2,848 $4,160
96,001-98,000 $609 $1,395 $2,155 $2,916 $4,260
98,001-100,000 $623 $1,427 $2,206 $2,985 $4,360
100,001-102,000 $637 $1,460 $2,257 $3,053 $4,460
102,001-104,000 $651 $1,493 $2,307 $3,121 $4,560
104,001-106,000 $666 $1,526 $2,358 $3,190 $4,660
106,001-108,000 $680 $1,558 $2,408 $3,258 $4,760
108,001-110,000 $694 $1,591 $2,459 $3,327 $4,860
110,001-112,000 $709 $1,624 $2,510 $3,395 $4,960
112,001-114,000 $723 $1,657 $2,560 $3,464 $5,060


Maximum Gross
Weight of Vehicle
(Pounds) Total Miles Driven
1 to 7,501 to 20,001 to 35,001 to Over
7,500 20,000 35,000 50,000 50,000
114,001-116,000 $737 $1,689 $2,611 $3,532 $5,160
116,001-118,000 $751 $1,722 $2,661 $3,601 $5,260
118,001-120,000 $766 $1,755 $2,712 $3,669 $5,360
120,001-122,000 $780 $1,788 $2,763 $3,738 $5,460
122,001-124,000 $794 $1,820 $2,813 $3,806 $5,560
124,001-126,000 $809 $1,853 $2,864 $3,874 $5,660
126,001-128,000 $823 $1,886 $2,914 $3,943 $5,760
128,001-129,000 $837 $1,918 $2,965 $4,011 $5,860
In addition to the registration fees provided for in this subsection, there
shall be an additional registration fee imposed of twenty-five dollars
($25.00).
(d) In addition to the fees set forth in paragraphs (a) and (c) of this
subsection, an owner or operator may purchase a temporary permit as pro-
vided in section 49-432(2), Idaho Code, for operation of a vehicle at a
weight in excess of the current, valid, registered maximum gross vehi-
cle weight. The permit so issued shall be specific to the motor vehicle
to which it is issued. No permit or fee shall be transferable or appor-
tionable to any other vehicle, nor shall any such fee be refundable.
(e) Any commercial or farm vehicle registered for more than sixty thou-
sand (60,000) pounds up to one hundred six thousand (106,000) pounds
traveling fewer than two thousand five hundred (2,500) miles annually
on roads and highways in the state, county, city and highway district
systems in Idaho shall pay an annual registration fee of two hundred
fifty-five dollars ($255). The provisions of section 49-437(2), Idaho
Code, shall not apply to vehicles registered under this paragraph.
(9)(a) During the first registration year that the fee schedule in sub-
section (8)(c) of this section is in use, an owner shall use the mileage
data from the records used to report the mileage use fee in the immedi-
ately preceding year as the basis for determining the appropriate reg-
istration fee schedule.
(b) Any owner who registers a motor vehicle for the first time and who
has no mileage history for the vehicle shall estimate the miles to de-
termine the appropriate fee schedule in subsection (8)(c) of this sec-
tion. When estimating the miles, the owner shall provide a statement on
the application of the method used to arrive at the estimated miles.
(c) Any owner using any fee schedule other than the highest fee sched-
ule under subsection (8)(c) of this section shall certify at the time of
registration that the miles operated in the preceding year do not exceed
the schedule applied for. Any owner using a fee schedule under subsec-
tion (8)(c) of this section that is less than the highest schedule shall
maintain records to substantiate the use of the schedule as required by
section 49-439, Idaho Code.


(10) An owner registering under subsection (8)(a) or (8)(c) of this sec-
tion may elect to pay the full annual registration fee at the time of regis-
tration or renewal of registration, or an owner may pay at least one-quarter
(1/4) of the annual registration fee due. The remainder of the annual Idaho
registration fee shall be paid in three (3) equal installments on dates as
billed by the department.
(11) An owner registering or renewing a registration under subsection
(8) (a) of this section electing to use installment payments as provided in
subsection (10) of this section shall pay all of the fees due to other IRP ju-
risdictions in addition to one-quarter (1/4) of the Idaho fee due at the time
of registration or reregistration. The remainder of the annual Idaho regis-
tration fee shall be paid in three (3) equal installments on dates as billed
by the department.
(12) If any vehicle or combinations of vehicles haul nonreducible
loads, as authorized under the provisions of section 49-1004, Idaho Code,
and weigh less than the starting weights per axle configuration listed in
column 1 of section 49-1004(2), Idaho Code, then and in that event there
shall be paid for that vehicle, in addition to the other fees required in this
section, an additional use fee of 2.1 mills per mile for each two thousand
(2,000) pounds or fraction thereof of the maximum gross weight in excess of
those set forth in section 49-1001, Idaho Code.
SECTION 9. That Section 49-443, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
49-443. LICENSE PLATES TO BE FURNISHED BY DEPARTMENT -- FORM AND
CONTENTS. (1) The assessor or the department shall furnish to every owner
whose vehicle is registered or licensed by that office, pursuant to sections
49-402 and 49-402A, Idaho Code, one (1) license plate for vehicles regis-
tered under the provisions of section 49-406, 49-406A or 49-408, Idaho Code,
or a motorcycle, trailer, truck-tractor, or semitrailer; one (1) restricted
vehicle license plate for all-terrain vehicles, utility type vehicles and
motorbikes licensed pursuant to this chapter; and two (2) license plates
for every other motor vehicle. If a vehicle is issued one (1) plate only,
that plate shall be displayed in accordance with the provisions of section
49-428, Idaho Code. For vehicles registered under the provisions of section
49-407, Idaho Code, the applicant shall provide one (1) plate to be displayed
on the rear of the vehicle.
Commencing January 1, 1992, the color and design of the plates shall be
comparable to the color and design of the statehood centennial issue of li-
cense plates with blue numerals and letters on a multicolored red, white and
blue background. Each license plate must bear upon its face the inscriptions
"Famous Potatoes" and "Scenic Idaho." The restricted vehicle license plate
for all-terrain vehicles, utility type vehicles and motorbikes shall be a
white background with black numerals and letters, with "Idaho Restricted Ve-
hicle" and the year of its expiration on its face and no other inscription.
The restricted vehicle license plate shall be the same size required for the
motorcycle license plate.
Every license plate shall have displayed upon it the registration num-
ber assigned to the vehicle and its owner and the name "Idaho," which may be
abbreviated. The plates issued under the provisions of section 49-402(1),


Idaho Code, and the required letters and numerals, including an identifica-
tion of the county in which the motor vehicle to which the plates will be af-
fixed is registered, shall be of sufficient size to be plainly readable from
a distance of seventy-five (75) feet during daylight, and each license plate
and registration sticker shall be treated with a fully reflectorized mate-
rial according to specifications prescribed by the board.
(2) License plates shall be valid for a period of ten (10) years begin-
ning with the date of issuance of new plates. At the end of the ninth year,
the registered owner shall receive notice of the date upon which the plates
will expire.
For specialty license plate programs discontinued pursuant to the
provisions of section 49-402C, Idaho Code, a registrant with a specialty
license plate currently registered under the program may use such license
plate for up to ten (10) years from the date of issuance. This provision
is intended to permit the use of the specialty plate by the registrant re-
gardless of the number of persons who purchase the specialty plate. The
registrant shall be required to pay the special plate program fees provided
for specialty plates pursuant to this chapter. Such fees shall be deposited
into the state highway account. For purposes of section 49-434, Idaho Code,
as it applies to commercial vehicles, and section 49-435, Idaho Code, the
department shall provide new plates bearing the same number or, upon request
from the registered owner, the next available number.
(3) If a license plate number has expired as provided in subsection (2)
of this section and is not renewed within sixty (60) days of its expiration,
the plate number shall be available for use by another registrant. To obtain
a specific number in the recycled license plate number file, the owner of a
registered vehicle may contact the county regarding availability.
The provisions of this subsection shall apply only to vehicles regis-
tered under the provisions of section 49-402(1), Idaho Code, and section
49-434(1), Idaho Code, as it applies to noncommercial vehicles.
(4) License plates issued for vehicles required to be registered in
accordance with the provisions of sections 49-402 and 49-402A, Idaho Code,
shall be issued color-coded red, white or blue registration validation
stickers showing the year of registration. Each registration validation
sticker shall bear a number from 1 through 12, which number shall correspond
to the month of the calendar year in which the registration of the vehicle
expires and shall be affixed to the lower right-hand corner of the plates
within the outlined rectangular area.
(5) (4) License plates for utility trailers registered under the pro-
visions of section 49-402A, Idaho Code, that are issued for five (5) or ten
(10) years and license plates for rental utility trailers registered under
the provisions of section 49-434, Idaho Code, that are issued for up to five
(5) years shall use the design in effect on the date of manufacture. If a de-
sign change occurs, plates from the effective date of the design change shall
be manufactured using the new design. Unexpired plates need not be reissued
to conform to a design change.
(6) (5) For license plates that are lost, stolen, mutilated, or il-
legible, the owner shall apply for a duplicate or substitute. The assessor
shall also furnish for each registration, and to validate the license plate,
a pressure-sensitive, uniquely numbered, color-coded red, white or blue


registration sticker, except for trailers and semitrailers registered under
the provisions in section 49-434, Idaho Code. License plates issued for
state, county and city motor vehicles shall be valid for ten (10) years pur-
suant to subsection (2) of this section and remain on the vehicle for which
issued from year to year and need no renewal or validation sticker.
(7) (6) Whenever a vehicle is completely destroyed by fire or accident
and the operator submits satisfactory proof of that destruction to the de-
partment or appropriate assessor's office, or the owner wishes to transfer
the remaining registration, use increment and fees shall be transferred to
the replacement vehicle for a service transfer fee of five dollars ($5.00),
which fee shall be retained by the registering authority. None of the origi-
nal fees shall be subject to refund.
(8) (7) The department shall furnish a printed or an electronic copy of
the registration card to every owner whose vehicle is registered under sec-
tions 49-434 and 49-435, Idaho Code.
(9) (8) The board shall have authority to require the return to the de-
partment of all license plates and registration stickers cards upon termina-
tion of the lawful use of them by the owner.
(10) (9) The board may promulgate such rules as are necessary to imple-
ment the provisions of this section.
SECTION 10. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.